Utah statutes.
31A-22-718.   Dependent coverage.

No group policy that provides coverage to children of group members may deny eligibility for coverage to a child solely because the child does not reside with the group member or solely because the child is solely dependent on a former spouse of the group member rather than on the group member.  A child who does not reside with the group member may be excluded on the same basis as children who do reside with the group member.



Enacted by Chapter 344, 1995 General Session

